Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2245SV (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 576 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 572A.1 General contractors ââ bond. 1 1. A general contractor, as defined in section 572.1, shall 2 obtain a performance bond payable to the person for whom the 3 general contractor is performing work in the amount of fifty 4 thousand dollars prior to performing any work in this state. 5 The performance bond shall be executed by a surety company 6 authorized to do business in this state. 7 2. This section does not apply to a general contractor 8 performing work for the state or a political subdivision of the 9 state, including a general contractor performing work that is 10 subject to the requirements of chapter 8A, subchapter III. 11 3. A county, city, township, or school district shall not 12 require that a general contractor file a bond for private work 13 other than as required by this section. 14